Hawaii statutes.
[§196-64] Functions, powers, and duties of the authority. (a)
In the performance of, and with respect to the functions,
powers, and duties vested in the authority by this part, the authority, as
directed by the director and in accordance with a green infrastructure
loan program order or orders under section 269-171 or an annual plan submitted
by the authority pursuant to this section, as approved by the
public utilities commission may:

(1) Make loans and expend funds to finance the purchase or installation of green infrastructure
equipment for clean energy technology, demand response technology, and energy
use reduction and demand side management infrastructure, programs, and
services;

(2) Hold and invest moneys
in the green infrastructure special fund in investments as
permitted by law and in accordance with approved investment guidelines
established in one or more orders issued by the public utilities commission
pursuant to section 269-171;

(3) Hire employees necessary to
perform its duties, including an executive director. The executive director
shall be appointed by the authority, and the employees' positions,
including the executive director's position, shall be exempt from chapter 76;

(4) Enter
into contracts for the service of consultants for rendering professional and
technical assistance and advice, and any other contracts that are necessary and
proper for the implementation of the loan program;

(5) Enter into contracts for the administration of
the loan program, without the necessity of complying with chapter 103D;

(6) Establish
loan program guidelines to be approved in one or more orders issued by the public utilities commission
pursuant to section 269-171 to carry out the purposes of this part;

(7) Be
audited at least annually by a firm of independent certified public accountants
selected by the authority, and provide the results of this audit to the department
and the public utilities commission; and

(8) Perform
all functions necessary to effectuate the purposes of this part.

(b) The authority shall submit to the public
utilities commission an annual plan for review and approval no later than
ninety days prior to the start of each fiscal year. The annual plan submitted
by the authority shall include the authority's projected operational budget for
the succeeding fiscal year. [L 2013, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next